src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON SP-DAT/GEN/NOM-PXPL3
@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL3@+Sg+Nom+PxPl3:@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL3@%>сн%{АО%} NounEnd_K ;
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL3@+Pl+Nom+PxPl3:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL3@%>сн%{АО%} NounEnd_K ;
@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.GEN@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL3@+Sg+Gen+PxPl3:@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.GEN@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL3@%>сн%{АО%}%>%{ЕОØ%}н NounEnd_K ;
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.GEN@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL3@+Pl+Gen+PxPl3:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.GEN@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL3@%>сн%{АО%}%>%{ЕОØ%}н NounEnd_K ;
@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.DAT@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL3@+Sg+Dat+PxPl3:@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.DAT@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL3@%>сн%{АО%}%>%{ЕОØ%}нды K/DAT-ARAM ;
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.DAT@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL3@+Pl+Dat+PxPl3:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.DAT@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL3@%>сн%{АО%}%>%{ЕОØ%}нды K/DAT-ARAM ;
!+Sg+Nom+PxPl3:%>сн%{АО%} NounEnd_K ;
@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL3@+Sg+Nom+PxPl3:@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL3@%>сн%{АО%} SG-NMN-COP-FOR_MUTUAL-PRT2 ;
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL3@+Pl+Nom+PxPl3:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL3@%>сн%{АО%} SG-NMN-COP-FOR_MUTUAL-PRT2 ;
@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL3@+Sg+Nom+PxPl3:@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL3@%>сн%{АО%} SG-NMN-COP-FOR_MUTUAL-NONPST-SG-12 ;
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL3@+Pl+Nom+PxPl3:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL3@%>сн%{АО%} SG-NMN-COP-FOR_MUTUAL-NONPST-SG-12 ;
!+Sg+Gen+PxPl3:%>сн%{АО%}%>%{ЕОØ%}н NounEnd_K ;
!+Sg+Dat+PxPl3:%>сн%{АО%}%>%{ЕОØ%}нды NounEnd_K ;
!+Pl+Nom+PxPl3:%>сн%{АО%} NounEnd_K ;
@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL3@+Sg+Nom+PxPl3:@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL3@%>сн%{АО%} PL-NMN-COP-FOR_MUTUAL-PRT2 ;
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL3@+Pl+Nom+PxPl3:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL3@%>сн%{АО%} PL-NMN-COP-FOR_MUTUAL-PRT2 ;
@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL3@+Sg+Nom+PxPl3:@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL3@%>сн%{АО%} PL-NMN-COP-FOR_MUTUAL-NONPST-PL-12 ;
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL3@+Pl+Nom+PxPl3:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL3@%>сн%{АО%} PL-NMN-COP-FOR_MUTUAL-NONPST-PL-12 ;
!+Pl+Gen+PxPl3:%>сн%{АО%}%>%{ЕОØ%}н NounEnd_K ;
!+Pl+Dat+PxPl3:%>сн%{АО%}%>%{ЕОØ%}нды NounEnd_K ;



LEXICON SG-NOM-INDEF
 SG-NOM-INDEF-WITH-SUFF ;
 SG-NOM-INDEF-WITHOUT-SUFF ;
LEXICON SG-NOM-INDEF-WITHOUT-SUFF
@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.INDEF@+Sg+Nom+Indef:@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.INDEF@ NounEnd_K ;
LEXICON SG-NOM-INDEF-WITH-SUFF
@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.INDEF@+Sg+Nom+Indef:@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.INDEF@ SG-NMN-COP-FOR_MUTUAL-PRT2 ;
@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.INDEF@+Sg+Nom+Indef:@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.INDEF@ SG-NMN-COP-FOR_MUTUAL-NONPST-SG-12 ;

LEXICON NOTDEF-ABE
@U.DECL-NX.SP@@U.CX.ABE@+SP+Abe:@U.DECL-NX.SP@@U.CX.ABE@%>фтом%{АО%} Choose-INDEF-OBLPX-ava_OR_DER/COP ;

LEXICON NOTDEF-ABL
@U.DECL-NX.SP@@U.CX.ABL@+SP+Abl:@U.DECL-NX.SP@@U.CX.ABL@%>д%{АО%} Choose-INDEF-OBLPX-ava_OR_DER/COP ;
@U.DECL-NX.SP@@U.CX.ABL@+SP+Abl+Err/Orth-t-d:@U.DECL-NX.SP@@U.CX.ABL@%^Devoice%>т%{АО%} Choose-INDEF-OBLPX-ava_OR_DER/COP ;

LEXICON NOTDEF-CAU
 SP-CAU ;

LEXICON NOTDEF-CMPR
@U.DECL-NX.SP@@U.CX.CMP@+SP+Cmpr:@U.DECL-NX.SP@@U.CX.CMP@%>шка Choose-INDEF-OBLPX-ava_OR_DER/COP ;
@U.DECL-NX.SP@@U.CX.CMP@+SP+Cmpr:@U.DECL-NX.SP@@U.CX.CMP@%>%{ЕО%}%>шка Choose-INDEF-OBLPX-ava_OR_DER/COP ;

LEXICON NOTDEF-ILL
 SP-ILL-INDEF ;
 SP-ILL-PX ;

LEXICON NOTDEF-INE
@U.DECL-NX.SP@@U.CX.INE@+SP+Ine:@U.DECL-NX.SP@@U.CX.INE@%>с%{АО%} Choose-INDEF-OBLPX-ava_OR_DER/COP ;
@D.MWN.YES@+SP+Ine+Der/MWN:@D.MWN.YES@%>с%{АО%} MWN_NUM_CASE ;!2024-06-15

LEXICON NOTDEF-PRL
@U.DECL-NX.SP@@U.CX.PRL@+SP+Prl:@U.DECL-NX.SP@@U.CX.PRL@%>%{вгк%}%{АЕ%} Choose-INDEF-OBLPX-ava_OR_DER/COP ;
@U.DECL-NX.SP@@U.CX.PRL@+SP+Prl:@U.DECL-NX.SP@@U.CX.PRL@%>гя Choose-INDEF-OBLPX-ava_OR_DER/COP ;

LEXICON NOTDEF-TRA
@U.DECL-NX.SP@@U.CX.TRA@+SP+Tra+Indef:@U.DECL-NX.SP@@U.CX.TRA@%>%{ЕОØ%}кс NounEnd_K ; !! Ананьина К.И. 2000 53
@U.DECL-NX.SP@@U.CX.TRA@@U.DECL-DX.INDEF@+SP+Tra+Indef:@U.DECL-NX.SP@@U.CX.TRA@@U.DECL-DX.INDEF@%>кс NounEnd_K ; !CHECKME 2017-03-22 $валокс

!!!
LEXICON DERPOSS-NUM-CASE ! ...нне
PL-DAT/GEN/NOM-DEF ;
SG-DAT/GEN/NOM-DEF ;
PL-NOM-INDEF ;
 SG-NOM-INDEF ;
 SP-ABE ;
 SP-ABL ;
SP-CAU ;
SP-CMPR ;
SP-DAT-INDEF ;
SP-ELA-INDEF ;
SP-GEN-INDEF ;
SP-ILL-INDEF ;
SP-INE ;
SP-PRL_Ova ;
SP-TRA-INDEF_ks ;

LEXICON MWN_NUM_CASE ! алашань кедьстось
@P.MWN.YES@ PL-DAT/GEN/NOM-DEF ;
@P.MWN.YES@ SG-DAT/GEN/NOM-DEF ;
!PL-NOM-INDEF ;
! SG-NOM-INDEF ;
! SP-ABE ;
! SP-ABL ;
!SP-CAU ;
!SP-CMPR ;
!SP-DAT-INDEF ;
!SP-ELA-INDEF ;
!SP-GEN-INDEF ;
!SP-ILL-INDEF ;
!SP-INE ;
!SP-PRL_Ova ;
!SP-TRA-INDEF_ks ;


!!!
!@U.DECL-NX.SP@@U.CX.TRA@@U.DECL-DX.INDEF@
LEXICON SP-ABE
@U.DECL-NX.SP@@U.CX.ABE@+SP+Abe:@U.DECL-NX.SP@@U.CX.ABE@%>фтом%{АО%} Choose-INDEF-OBLPX-ava_OR_DER/COP ;
@D.MWN.YES@+SP+Abe+Der/MWN:@D.MWN.YES@%>фтом%{АО%} MWN_NUM_CASE ;

LEXICON SP-ABL
@U.DECL-NX.SP@@U.CX.ABL@+SP+Abl:@U.DECL-NX.SP@@U.CX.ABL@%>д%{АО%} Choose-INDEF-OBLPX-ava_OR_DER/COP ;

LEXICON SP-CAU
@U.DECL-NX.SP@@U.CX.CAU@@U.DECL-DX.INDEF@+SP+Cau+Indef:@U.DECL-NX.SP@@U.CX.CAU@@U.DECL-DX.INDEF@%>%{ЕОØ%}нкса NounEnd_K ;

LEXICON SP-CMPR
@U.DECL-NX.SP@@U.CX.CMP@+SP+Cmpr:@U.DECL-NX.SP@@U.CX.CMP@%>шка Choose-INDEF-OBLPX-ava_OR_DER/COP ;

LEXICON SP-DAT-INDEF
@U.DECL-NX.SP@@U.CX.DAT@@U.DECL-DX.INDEF@+SP+Dat+Indef:@U.DECL-NX.SP@@U.CX.DAT@@U.DECL-DX.INDEF@%>%{ЕОØ%}нди K/DAT-ARAM ;

LEXICON SP-ELA-INDEF
@U.DECL-NX.SP@@U.CX.ELA@+SP+Ela:@U.DECL-NX.SP@@U.CX.ELA@%>ст%{АО%} Choose-INDEF-OBLPX-ava_OR_DER/COP ;
@U.DECL-NX.SP@@U.CX.ELA@+SP+Ela+Der+Der/NJ+A:@U.DECL-NX.SP@@U.CX.ELA@%>стонь K  ;
@U.DECL-NX.SP@@U.CX.ELA@+SP+Ela+Der+Der/Poss+N:@U.DECL-NX.SP@@U.CX.ELA@%>стонне DERPOSS-NUM-CASE  ;
@D.MWN.YES@+SP+Ela+Der/MWN:@D.MWN.YES@%>ст%{АО%} MWN_NUM_CASE ;

LEXICON SP-GEN-INDEF
@U.DECL-NX.SP@@U.CX.GEN@@U.DECL-DX.INDEF@+SP+Gen+Indef:@U.DECL-NX.SP@@U.CX.GEN@@U.DECL-DX.INDEF@%>%{ЕОØ%}нь NounEnd_K ;
@U.DECL-NX.SP@@U.CX.GEN@@U.DECL-DX.INDEF@+SP+Gen+Indef+Err/Orth-glide-final:@U.DECL-NX.SP@@U.CX.GEN@@U.DECL-DX.INDEF@%^Glide%>нь NounEnd_K ;
!! сельме+N+SP+Gen+Indef
!!€ сельм%{ЕО%}%>%{ЕОØ%}нь
!!€ сельмо%>0нь
@U.DECL-NX.SP@@U.CX.COM@@U.DECL-DX.INDEF@+SP+Com+Indef+AssocColl:@U.DECL-NX.SP@@U.CX.COM@@U.DECL-DX.INDEF@%>нек NounEnd_K ;
	DER-POSS_NNE ;

LEXICON DER-POSS_NNE
+Der+Der/Poss+N:%>%{ЕОØ%}нне DERPOSS-NUM-CASE ; !want to limit this 2019-07-02


LEXICON SP-ILL-INDEF
@U.DECL-NX.SP@@U.CX.ILL@@U.DECL-DX.INDEF@+SP+Ill+Indef:@U.DECL-NX.SP@@U.CX.ILL@@U.DECL-DX.INDEF@%>с NounEnd_K ;
LEXICON SP-ILL-PX
@U.DECL-NX.SP@@U.CX.ILL@+SP+Ill:@U.DECL-NX.SP@@U.CX.ILL@%>%{ЕОØ%}з OBLIQUECX-PX-osh ; 

LEXICON SP-INE
@U.DECL-NX.SP@@U.CX.INE@+SP+Ine:@U.DECL-NX.SP@@U.CX.INE@%>с%{АО%} Choose-INDEF-OBLPX-ava_OR_DER/COP ;

LEXICON SP-LAT-INDEF
@U.DECL-NX.SP@@U.CX.LAT@@U.DECL-DX.INDEF@+SP+Lat+Indef:@U.DECL-NX.SP@@U.CX.LAT@@U.DECL-DX.INDEF@%>%{ВИУ%} NounEnd_K ;

LEXICON SP-PRL_Ova
@U.DECL-NX.SP@@U.CX.PRL@+SP+Prl:@U.DECL-NX.SP@@U.CX.PRL@%>%{ЕОØ%}ва Choose-INDEF-OBLPX-ava_OR_DER/COP ;
LEXICON SP-PRL_Ga
@U.DECL-NX.SP@@U.CX.PRL@+SP+Prl:@U.DECL-NX.SP@@U.CX.PRL@%>%{вгк%}%{АЕ%} Choose-INDEF-OBLPX-ava_OR_DER/COP ;

LEXICON SP-TRA-INDEF_Oks
@U.DECL-NX.SP@@U.CX.TRA@@U.DECL-DX.INDEF@+SP+Tra+Indef:@U.DECL-NX.SP@@U.CX.TRA@@U.DECL-DX.INDEF@%>%{ЕОØ%}кс NounEnd_K ;
LEXICON SP-TRA-INDEF_ks
@U.DECL-NX.SP@@U.CX.TRA@@U.DECL-DX.INDEF@+SP+Tra+Indef:@U.DECL-NX.SP@@U.CX.TRA@@U.DECL-DX.INDEF@%>кс NounEnd_K ;

!!!
!
LEXICON PL-NOM-INDEF
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.INDEF@+Pl+Nom+Indef:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.INDEF@%>%{Х%}т%{ЬØ%} NounEnd_K ;
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.INDEF@+Pl+Nom+Indef+Clt/Cop:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.INDEF@%>%{Х%}т%{ЬØ%} PL-NMN-COP-FOR_MUTUAL-PRT2 ;
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.INDEF@+Pl+Nom+Indef:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.INDEF@ PL-NMN-COP-FOR_MUTUAL-NONPST-PL-12 ;
!+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>%{Х%}т NounEnd_K ;
!!€ киза%^А2О%>%{Х%}т%{ЬØ%}
!!€ кизо0%>0т0

!THIS is for copula after oblique possessive suffixes
LEXICON PL/SG-NMN-COP-FOR_MUTUAL-PRS/PRT2-OR-K
 K ;
 PL/SG-NMN-COP-FOR_MUTUAL-PRS/PRT2 ;
LEXICON PL/SG-NMN-COP-FOR_MUTUAL-PRS/PRT2
SG-NMN-COP-FOR_MUTUAL-PRT2 ;
  PL-NMN-COP-FOR_MUTUAL-PRT2 ;
 SG-NMN-COP-FOR_MUTUAL-NONPST-SG-12 ;
  PL-NMN-COP-FOR_MUTUAL-NONPST-PL-12 ;

LEXICON SG-NMN-COP-FOR_MUTUAL-PRT2
 COPULA-PRT-10 ;
 COPULA-PRT-20 ;
 COPULA-PRT-30 ;

LEXICON PL-NMN-COP-FOR_MUTUAL-PRT2
 COPULA-PRT-40 ;
 COPULA-PRT-50 ;
 COPULA-PRT-60 ;

!LEXICON Choose-INDEF-OBLPX-kal
!+Indef: NounEnd_K ;
! OBLIQUECX-PX-kal ;

!LEXICON OBLIQUECX-PX-kal
!+PxSg1:%>%{ЕОØ%}н K ;
!+PxSg2:%>т K ;
!+PxSg3:%>%{ЕОØ%}нз%{АО%} K ;
!+PxPl1:%>%{ЕОØ%}нк K ;
!+PxPl2:%>%{ЕОØ%}нт K ;
!+PxPl3:%>ст K ;

LEXICON ADP_AS_SECONDARY_HEAD
PL-DAT/GEN/NOM-DEF ;
SG-DAT-DEF ;
SG-GEN-DEF ;
SG-NOM-DEF ;
SP-ABL ;
SP-GEN-INDEF ;
	     
LEXICON OBLIQUECX-PX-REQUIRES-VOWEL/NO-VOWEL
 OBLIQUECX-PX-REQUIRES-VOWEL ;
 OBLIQUECX-PX-REQUIRES-NO-VOWEL ;
 
LEXICON OBLIQUECX-PX-REQUIRES-VOWEL
@U.DECL-DX.PXSG1@+PxSg1:@U.DECL-DX.PXSG1@%>%{ЕОØ%}н PL/SG-NMN-COP-FOR_MUTUAL-PRS/PRT2-OR-K ;
@U.DECL-DX.PXSG3@+PxSg3:@U.DECL-DX.PXSG3@%>%{ЕОØ%}нз%{АО%} PL/SG-NMN-COP-FOR_MUTUAL-PRS/PRT2-OR-K ;
@U.DECL-DX.PXSG3@@C.DECL-NX@@C.CX@@C.DECL-DX@+PxSg3:@U.DECL-DX.PXSG3@@C.DECL-NX@@C.CX@@C.DECL-DX@%>%{ЕОØ%}нз%{АО%} MWN_NUM_CASE ;!2024-06-25
@U.DECL-DX.PXPL1@+PxPl1:@U.DECL-DX.PXPL1@%>%{ЕОØ%}нк PL/SG-NMN-COP-FOR_MUTUAL-PRS/PRT2-OR-K ;
@U.DECL-DX.PXPL1@+PxPl1+Use/NG:@U.DECL-DX.PXPL1@%>%{ЕОØ%}нок PL/SG-NMN-COP-FOR_MUTUAL-PRS/PRT2-OR-K ;
@U.DECL-DX.PXPL2@+PxPl2:@U.DECL-DX.PXPL2@%>%{ЕОØ%}нт PL/SG-NMN-COP-FOR_MUTUAL-PRS/PRT2-OR-K ;
@U.DECL-DX.PXPL2@+PxPl2+Err/Orth:@U.DECL-DX.PXPL2@%>%{ЕОØ%}нонт PL/SG-NMN-COP-FOR_MUTUAL-PRS/PRT2-OR-K ;!1901 Gospel

LEXICON OBLIQUECX-PX-REQUIRES-NO-VOWEL
@U.DECL-DX.PXSG2@+PxSg2:@U.DECL-DX.PXSG2@%>т PL/SG-NMN-COP-FOR_MUTUAL-PRS/PRT2-OR-K ;
@U.DECL-DX.PXPL3@+PxPl3:@U.DECL-DX.PXPL3@%>ст PL/SG-NMN-COP-FOR_MUTUAL-PRS/PRT2-OR-K ;


!LEXICON Choose-INDEF-OBLPX-osh
!+Indef: K ;
! OBLIQUECX-PX-osh ;

LEXICON OBLIQUECX-PX-osh
@U.DECL-DX.PXSG1@+PxSg1:@U.DECL-DX.PXSG1@%>%{ЕОØ%}н NounEnd_K ;
@U.DECL-DX.PXSG2@+PxSg2:@U.DECL-DX.PXSG2@%>т NounEnd_K ;
@U.DECL-DX.PXSG2@+PxSg2+Use/NG:@U.DECL-DX.PXSG2@%>%{ЕОØ%}т NounEnd_K ;
@U.DECL-DX.PXSG3@+PxSg3:@U.DECL-DX.PXSG3@%>%{ЕОØ%}нз%{АО%} NounEnd_K ;
@U.DECL-DX.PXPL1@+PxPl1:@U.DECL-DX.PXPL1@%>%{ЕОØ%}нк NounEnd_K ;
@U.DECL-DX.PXPL1@+PxPl1+Use/NG:@U.DECL-DX.PXPL1@%>%{ЕОØ%}нок NounEnd_K ;
@U.DECL-DX.PXPL2@+PxPl2:@U.DECL-DX.PXPL2@%>%{ЕОØ%}нт NounEnd_K ;
@U.DECL-DX.PXPL2@+PxPl2+Err/Orth:@U.DECL-DX.PXPL2@%>%{ЕОØ%}нонт NounEnd_K ;!Gospel 1901
@U.DECL-DX.PXPL3@+PxPl3:@U.DECL-DX.PXPL3@%>%{ЕОØ%}ст NounEnd_K ;


LEXICON Choose-INDEF-OBLPX-ava_OR_DER/COP
 Choose-INDEF-OBLPX-ava ;
+Indef: DER/COP ;
 
LEXICON Choose-INDEF-OBLPX-ava
@U.DECL-DX.INDEF@+Indef:@U.DECL-DX.INDEF@ NounEnd_K ;
 OBLIQUECX-PX-ava ;

LEXICON OBLIQUECX-PX-ava
#2022-05-19 OBLIQUECX-PX-osh ;
 OBLIQUECX-PX-REQUIRES-VOWEL/NO-VOWEL ;
!+PxSg1:%>%{ЕОØ%}н K ;
!+PxSg2:%>т K ;
!+PxSg3:%>%{ЕОØ%}нз%{АО%} K ;
!+PxPl1:%>%{ЕОØ%}нк K ;
!+PxPl2:%>%{ЕОØ%}нт K ;
!+PxPl3:%>%{ЕОØ%}ст K ;

LEXICON K_OR_DER/COP
	DER/COP ;
	K ;
	
LEXICON DER/COP
 COPULA-NONPAST-10 ;
 COPULA-NONPAST-20 ;
 COPULA-NONPAST-40 ;
 COPULA-NONPAST-50 ;
 COPULA-NONPAST-60 ;
 COPULA-PRT-10 ;
 COPULA-PRT-20 ;
 COPULA-PRT-30 ;
 COPULA-PRT-40 ;
 COPULA-PRT-50 ;
 COPULA-PRT-60 ;

LEXICON N-VOC_J/KAJ
 N-VOC_J ;
 N-VOC_KAJ ;

LEXICON N-VOC_J/KAJ/NIAJ
 N-VOC_J ;
 N-VOC_KAJ ;
 N-VOC_NIAJ ;
LEXICON N-VOC_J/KANIAJ
 N-VOC_J ;
 N-VOC_KANIAJ ;
LEXICON N-VOC_J/KAJ/KANIAJ
 N-VOC_J ;
 N-VOC_KAJ ;
 N-VOC_KANIAJ ;
LEXICON N-VOC_J/KAJ/KANIAJ/NIAJ
 N-VOC_J ;
 N-VOC_KAJ ;
 N-VOC_KANIAJ ;
 N-VOC_NIAJ ;
!LEXICON N-VOC_J/KANIAJ/NIAJ
! N-VOC_J ;
! N-VOC_KANIAJ ;
! N-VOC_NIAJ ;
LEXICON N-VOC_J/NIAJ
 N-VOC_J ;
 N-VOC_NIAJ ;
LEXICON N-VOC_KAJ/NIAJ
 N-VOC_KAJ ;
 N-VOC_NIAJ ;
LEXICON N-VOC_J
+Voc:й ENDLEX ;
LEXICON N-VOC_KAJ
+Voc:%>кай ENDLEX ;
LEXICON N-VOC_KANIAJ
+Voc:%>каняй ENDLEX ;
LEXICON N-VOC_KIAJ
+Voc:%^Devoice%^Ь2ZERO%>кяй ENDLEX ;
LEXICON N-VOC_NIAJ
+Voc:%>няй ENDLEX ;

!
LEXICON SG-NMN-COP-FOR_MUTUAL-NONPST-SG1
: COPULA-NONPAST-10 ;
